Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF428.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.055, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Receipts. The commissioner of management and budget shall credit to the game and fish fund all money received under the game and fish laws and all income from state lands acquired by purchase or gift for game or fish purposes, including receipts from: (1) licenses and permits issued; (2) fines and forfeited bail; (3) sales of contraband, wild animals, and other property under the control of the division, except as provided in section 97A.225, subdivision 8, clause (2); (4) fees from advanced education courses for hunters and trappers; (5) reimbursements of expenditures by the division; (6) contributions to the division; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (7) revenue credited to the game and fish fund under section 297A.94, paragraph (h), clause (1)new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (8) general fund transfers under subdivision 2cnew text end . Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.055, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2c. new text end new text begin Reimbursement for reduced fishing license fees; 65 years of age and older. new text end new text begin (a) By August 15 each year, the commissioner of management and budget must transfer the estimated lost revenue amount calculated under paragraph (b) from the general fund to the game and fish fund. new text end new text begin (b) By August 1 each year, the commissioner of natural resources must provide the commissioner of management and budget the number of licenses sold during the previous fiscal year to residents 65 years of age and older at the license fee provided under section 97A.475, subdivision 6, clause (8). The commissioner of management and budget must multiply this number by the difference between the fee amount provided in section 97A.475, subdivision 6, clause (1), and the fee amount provided under section 97A.475, subdivision 6, clause (8), to estimate the amount of revenue lost each fiscal year as a result of the lower fee amount charged to persons 65 years of age or older. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.475, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Resident fishing. Fees for the following licenses, to be issued to residents only, are: (1) for persons age 18 or over new text begin and under age 65 new text end to take fish by angling, $25; (2) for persons age 18 or over to take fish by angling, for a combined license for a married couple, $40; (3) for persons age 18 or over to take fish by spearing from a dark house, $6, and the person must possess an angling license; (4) for persons age 18 or over to take fish by angling for a 24-hour period selected by the licensee, $12; (5) for persons age 18 or over to take fish by angling for a consecutive 72-hour period selected by the licensee, $14; (6) for persons age 18 or over to take fish by angling for three consecutive years, $71; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (7) for persons age 16 or over and under age 18 to take fish by angling, $5new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (8) for persons age 65 or over to take fish by angling, $15new text end . Sec. 4. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin Sections 1 to 3 are effective July 1, 2025. new text end